New York, session 2025-2026, S7521.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 837 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 24 to read as follows: 3 24. Promulgate rules and regulations for safety standards for the 4 protection of law enforcement staff against the biological hazards posed 5 by spitting of persons in custody. Such regulations and standards may 6 include the purchase of safety equipment, but shall not include the 7 purchase or use of a spit hood, spit mask, spit covering, spit cap, or 8 any device that completely covers the face of the individual under 9 control or under an attempt to control. Such rules and regulations 10 shall include, but not be limited to, training requirements for all law 11 enforcement officers to be completed prior to the use of any such 12 protective equipment. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02584-01-5